hu: Snare dob karika típusa: Öntött; S-káva; Egyperemes; Botkímélő; Háromperemes; Fakáva; Egyéb
el: Τύπος στεφανιού ταμπούρου: Χυτοπρεσαριστό (die-cast); S-hoop; Μονής φλάντζας; Stick saver; Τριπλής φλάντζας; Ξύλινα στεφάνια; Άλλο
ja: スネアドラムフープタイプ: ダイキャスト; Sフープ; シングルフランジ; スティックセーバー; トリプルフランジ; ウッドフープ; その他
ro-RO: Tip de ramă pentru toba mică: Turnat sub presiune; S-hoop; Flanșă simplă; Stick saver; Flanșă triplă; Cercuri din lemn; Altele
ru: Тип обода малого барабана: Литой; S-Hoop; Однофланцевый; Stick saver; Трёхфланцевый; Деревянные ободья; Другое
da: Reifetype for lilletromme: Støbt; S-hoop; Single-flange; Stick saver; Triple-flange; Træreifer; Andet
zh-CN: 响弦鼓鼓圈类型: 压铸; S 型压圈; 单凸缘; 护鼓棒型; 三凸缘; 木压圈; 其他
pl: Typ obręczy werbla: Odlewane (die-cast); S-Hoop; Pojedynczo gięte (single-flange); Stick saver; Potrójnie gięte (triple-flange); Drewniane obręcze; Inne
pt-BR: Caixa, tipo de aro: Die-cast; S-hoop; Flange simples; Stick saver; Flange triplo; Aros de madeira; Outro
de: Art des Snaredrum-Spannreifens: Druckguss; S-Hoop; Einfach geflanscht; Stick-Saver; Dreifach geflanscht; Holzspannreifen; Andere
es: Tipo de aro del redoblante: Fundido a presión; Aro en S; Pestaña simple; Protector de baquetas; Triple pestaña; Aros de madera; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta obruča doboša: Lijevano; S-obruč; S jednom prirubnicom; Stick saver; S tri prirubnice; Drveni obruči; Ostalo
cs: Typ obruče malého bubnu: Odlévaný; S-hoop; Jednopřírubový; Stick saver; Třípřírubový; Dřevěné ráfky; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta obroča maličnega bobna: Tlačno lito; Obroč S; Enojna prirobnica; Zaščita za palice; Trojna prirobnica; Leseni obroči; Drugo
vi: Loại vành trống Snare: Đúc khuôn; Vành chữ S; Mặt bích đơn; Bảo vệ dùi trống; Mặt bích ba; Vành gỗ; Khác
th: ประเภทของขอบกลองสแนร์: ไดคาสต์; S-hoop; ซิงเกิลแฟลงจ์; สติกเซฟเวอร์; ทริปเปิลแฟลงจ์; ฮูปไม้; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de aro do tambor de tarola: Fundido sob pressão; Aro S; Flange simples; Stick saver; Flange tripla; Aros de madeira; Outro
zh-TW: 小鼓鼓框類型: 壓鑄; S 鼓框; 單凸緣; Stick saver; 三凸緣; 木質鼓框; 其他
ko: 스네어 드럼 후프 유형: 다이캐스트; S-후프; 싱글 플랜지; 스틱 세이버; 트리플 플랜지; 우드 후프; 기타
lt-LT: Mažojo būgno apvado tipas: Lietas; „S-hoop“ tipo; Viengubo flanšo; Lazdelę tausojantis; Trigubo flanšo; Mediniai lankai; Kita
sk-SK: Typ obruče pre malý bubon: Tlakovo liaty; S-ráfik; Jednoprírubový; Stick saver; Trojprírubový; Drevené ráfiky; Iný
sv: Typ av ring/rand för virveltrumma: Gjuten; S-hoop; Enkelfläns; Stick saver; Trippelfläns; Träsargar; Övrigt
nl: Type spanrand snaredrum: Gegoten; S-hoop; Single-flange; Stick saver; Triple-flange; Houten spanranden; Anders
fr: Type de cerclage de caisse claire: Moulé sous pression; S-hoop; À simple bride; Stick saver; À triple bride; Cercles en bois; Autre
bg-BG: Тип обръч на соло барабан: Лят под налягане; S-образен обръч; Еднофланцов; Запазващ палките (Stick saver); Трифланцов; Дървени обръчи; Друго
fi: Virvelirummun vanten etyyppi: Painevalettu; S-vanne; Yksilaippainen; Stick saver; Kolmilaippainen; Puuvanteet; Muu
tr: Trampet çember tipi: Döküm; S-kasnak; Tek flanşlı; Baget koruyucu; Üç flanşlı; Ahşap kasnak; Diğer
it: Tipo di cerchio del rullante: Pressofuso; S-hoop; A flangia singola; Stick saver; A tripla flangia; Cerchi in legno; Altro
en: Snare drum hoop type: Die-cast; S-hoop; Single-flange; Stick saver; Triple-flange; Wood hoops; Other
nb: Løkketype for skarptromme: Støpt; S-hoop; Enkeltflens; Stick saver; Trippelflens; Spennringer i tre; Annet